Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202529-2935
Department of Health and Human Services; access to data and information for evaluation; authorized.

For purposes of evaluating the treatment process, the Department of Correctional Services, the Board of Parole, and the designated aftercare treatment programs shall allow appropriate access to data and information as requested by the Department of Health and Human Services.

Laws 1992, LB 523, § 14;

Laws 1996, LB 645, § 19;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 88;

Laws 2018, LB841, § 4;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 37.